Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1 DEFINITIONS AND CITATION
"State" means a state, territory, organized or unorganized, or district of the United States.

"State motor vehicle licensing agency" means the department of revenue.

"State traffic control manual" means the most recent edition of the "Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for Streets and Highways", including any supplement thereto, as adopted by the transportation commission.

"Steam and electric trains" includes:

"Railroad", which means a carrier of persons or property upon cars, other than street cars, operated upon stationary rails;

"Railroad train", which means a steam engine, electric, or other motor, with or without cars coupled thereto, operated upon rails, except streetcars;

"Streetcar", which means a car other than a railroad train for transporting persons or property upon rails principally within a municipality.

"Stinger-steered" means a semitrailer combination configuration wherein the fifth wheel is located on a drop frame located behind and below the rearmost axle of the power unit.

"Stop" or "stopping" means, when prohibited, any halting, even momentarily, of a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or in compliance with the directions of a police officer or official traffic control device.

"Stop line" or "limit line" means a line which indicates where drivers shall stop when directed by an official traffic control device or a police officer.

(101.5) "Street rod vehicle" means a vehicle manufactured in 1948 or earlier with a body design that has been modified for safe road use.

"Supervisor" means the executive director of the department of revenue or head of a group, division, or subordinate department appointed by the executive director in accordance with article 35 of title 24, C.R.S.

(102.5) "Surge brakes" means a system whereby the brakes of a trailer are actuated as a result of the forward pressure of the trailer against the tow vehicle during deceleration.

(102.7) "Temporary special event license plate" means a special license plate valid for a limited time period that is issued to a person or group of people in connection with a special event. "Temporary special event license plate" does not mean a special plate for the purposes of section 42-3-207.

(102.8) "Third-party provider" means an electronic vehicle or special mobile machinery registration, lien, or titling service provider that is approved by the department to perform the registration, lien, and titling functions set forth in articles 1 to 6 of this title 42.

"Through highway" means every highway or portion thereof on which vehicular traffic is given preferential right-of-way and at the entrances to which other vehicular traffic from intersecting highways is required by law to yield the right-of-way to vehicles on such through highway in obedience to a stop sign, yield sign, or other official traffic control device when such signs or devices are erected as provided by law.

(103.5) (a) "Toy vehicle" means any vehicle that has wheels and is not designed for use on public highways or for off-road use.

"Toy vehicle" includes, but is not limited to, gas-powered or electric-powered vehicles commonly known as mini bikes, "pocket" bikes, kamikaze boards, go-peds, and stand-up scooters.

"Toy vehicle" does not include electric scooters, off-highway vehicles, or snowmobiles.

"Traffic" means pedestrians, ridden or herded animals, and vehicles, streetcars, and other conveyances either singly or together while using any highway for the purposes of travel.

"Trailer" means any wheeled vehicle, without motive power, which is designed to be drawn by a motor vehicle and to carry its cargo load wholly upon its own structure and that is generally and commonly used to carry and transport property over the public highways. The term includes, but is not limited to, multipurpose trailers as defined in subsection (60.3) of this section.

"Trailer coach" means a wheeled vehicle having an overall length, excluding towing gear and bumpers, of not less than twenty-six feet, without motive power, that is designed and generally and commonly used for occupancy by persons for residential purposes, in temporary locations, and that may occasionally be drawn over the public highways by a motor vehicle and is licensed as a vehicle.

"Manufactured home" means any preconstructed building unit or combination of preconstructed building units, without motive power, where such unit or units are manufactured in a factory or at a location other than the residential site of the completed home, which is designed and commonly used for occupancy by persons for residential purposes, in either temporary or permanent locations, and which unit or units are not licensed as a vehicle.

"Transporter" means every person engaged in the business of delivering vehicles of a type required to be registered under articles 1 to 4 of this title from a manufacturing, assembling, or distributing plant to dealers or sales agents of a manufacturer.

"Truck" means any motor vehicle equipped with a body designed to carry property and which is generally and commonly used to carry and transport property over the public highways.

"Truck tractor - laden" or "laden truck tractor" means any motor vehicle carrying cargo that is generally and commonly designed and used to draw, and is drawing, a semitrailer or trailer and its cargo load over the public highways.

(109.5) "Truck tractor - unladen" or "unladen truck tractor" means any motor vehicle not carrying cargo that is generally used to draw a semitrailer or trailer and its cargo load over the public highways.

(109.7) "UDD" means underage drinking and driving, and use of the term shall incorporate by reference the offense described in section 42-4-1301 (2)(d).

"Used vehicle" means every motor vehicle which has been sold, bargained for, exchanged, or given away, or has had the title transferred from the person who first acquired it from the manufacturer or importer, and has been so used as to have become what is commonly known as "secondhand" within the ordinary meaning thereof.

"Utility trailer" means any wheeled vehicle weighing two thousand pounds or less, without motive power, which is designed to be drawn by a motor vehicle and which is generally and commonly used to carry and transport personal effects, articles of household furniture, loads of trash and rubbish, or not to exceed two horses over the public highways.

"Vehicle" means a device that is capable of moving itself, or of being moved, from place to place upon wheels or endless tracks. "Vehicle" includes a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, electric scooter, or EPAMD, but does not include a wheelchair, off-highway vehicle, snowmobile, farm tractor, or implement of husbandry designed primarily or exclusively for use and used in agricultural operations or any device moved exclusively over stationary rails or tracks or designed to move primarily through the air.

(112.5) "Vendor" means an organization that collects bulk data for the purpose of reselling the data.

"Wheelchair" means a motorized or nonmotorized wheeled device designed for use by a person with a physical disability.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2094, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(17), (86), (89), and (109) amended and (109.5) added, p. 470, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(102.5) added, p. 629, § 1, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 97:

(58) amended and (60.5) added, p. 392, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 98:

(68.5) added, p. 1239, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(10.5), (72.5), and (112.5) added, p. 1239, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2000:

(88) amended, p. 20, § 1, effective March 9; (96) and (102) amended, p. 1639, § 21, effective June 1; (44) amended, p. 548, § 1, effective July 1; (58) amended, p. 698, § 16, effective July 1; (53) and (74) amended, p. 1348, § 13, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2001:

(17.5) added and (61) amended, p. 504, § 1, effective May 18; (24.5) and (41.5) added, p. 729, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2002:

(35) and (36) amended, p. 1, § 1, effective March 1; (27) amended, p. 1033, § 72, effective June 1; (4.5) added, p. 404, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2003:

(102.7) added, p. 1847, § 1, effective May 21; (72.7) added, p. 809, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

(19) and (69) amended, p. 640, § 1, effective May 27; (103.5) added, p. 1241, § 1, effective June 3; (43.5) added, p. 335, § 4, effective July 1; (23.5) and (101.5) added and (36) amended, p. 1071, § 1, effective August 8; (24.5) amended, p. 665, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(102.7) amended, p. 1509, § 62, effective June 1; (17.5) amended, p. 43, § 2, effective July 1; (24.5) amended, p. 1753, § 4, effective January 1, 2007; (68.5) amended, p. 1366, § 1, effective January 1, 2007; (45.5) added, p. 1411, § 1, effective July 1, 2007.

L. 2007:

(109) and (109.5) amended, p. 282, § 1, effective March 29.

L. 2008:

(6) amended, p. 2083, § 8, effective June 3; (8.5), (27.3), (27.5), (27.7), (41.7), and (109.7) added, p. 243, § 2, effective July 1; (19)(e) added, p. 473, § 2, effective July 1; (60.3) added and (105) and (106)(a) amended, p. 637, § 1, effective August 5; (69) amended, p. 2271, § 1, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2009:

(39.5) and (48.6) added and (55), (58), and (60.5) amended, (SB 09-075), ch. 418, p. 2320, § 4, effective August 5; (10), (55), (56), (58), (59), (103.5), and (112) amended and (28.5), (28.7), and (48.5) added, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1260, § 22, effective October 1.

L. 2010:

(88) amended and (88.5) added, (HB 10-1232), ch. 163, p. 572, § 10, effective April 28; (72.2) added, (SB 10-144), ch. 289, p. 1345, § 1, effective July 1; (44) amended, (SB 10-177), ch. 392, p. 1861, § 2, effective August 11; (52.5) added, (SB 10-075), ch. 169, p. 597, § 1, effective August 11; (33), (41), (54), and (60) amended and (93.5) added, (HB 10-1172), ch. 320, p. 1486, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2011:

(55) amended, (HB 11-1188), ch. 175, p. 663, § 6, effective May 13.

L. 2013:

(41.7) repealed, (HB 13-1325), ch. 331, p. 1879, § 4, effective May 28; (47.5) added, (HB 13-1289), ch. 380, p. 2224, § 2, effective June 5; (47.5) amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2396, § 40, effective June 5; (68.5) amended, (HB 13-1240), ch. 361, p. 2112, § 2, effective January 1, 2014.

L. 2014:

(31.5) added, (SB 14-194), ch. 346, p. 1541, § 1, effective June 5; (7.5) added and (55) amended, (HB 14-1367), ch. 303, p. 1285, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(109.7) amended, (HB 15-1043), ch. 262, p. 996, § 5, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(88.5)(b)(II) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 797, § 118, effective June 6.

L. 2017:

(7.5) and (55) amended, (HB 17-1044), ch. 72, p. 228, § 1, effective March 23; IP amended and (7.7), (27.8), and (43.3) added, (SB 17-213), ch. 277, p. 1517, § 2, effective August 9; (5) amended and (16.5) and (47.3) added, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 358, § 1, effective August 9; (28.5) and (58) amended, (HB 17-1151), ch. 98, p. 295, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(24) amended and (90.5) and (102.8) added, (HB 18-1299), ch. 297, p. 1808, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

L. 2019:

(28.8) added and (48.5)(b), (58), (103.5)(c), and (112) amended, (HB 19-1221), ch. 271, p. 2557, § 1, effective May 23; (69.5) added, (HB 19-1298), ch. 384, p. 3438, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(10.3) added, (SB 20-061), ch. 30, p. 101, § 1, effective July 1.